Actually, that book "the Russian origins of World War One" isn't that great. I think it was written so "cold warrior" types would eat it up while the rest would tune it out, if that makes sense. It has some interesting and true things, but it's missing a lot. And it's premise doesn't hold up to scrutiny either--you can't really blame any one country for the outbreak of the first world war. You can blame a small group of people in each of the belligerents though (including Russia, particularly Sazanov), and it's more interesting to look at the questionable decisions of those people and try to pick apart their motives.

I've been looking into this and found some better sources on the origins of World War One and the Russian civil war, which are intimately related:


------------


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.183514/2015.183514.The-Origin-Of-The-War-Of-1914-Vol-11_djvu.txt

The books by Albertini are a definitive source. Albertini traveled the world and interviewed a lot of the people responsible for the war or close to those responsible for the war. His interview with Artamanov, the Russian official in contact with the man who planned the assassination of Archduke Ferdinand (Dimitricvic or "Apis," the leader of the conspiratorial pan-Serbian organization "Black Hand"), is particularly interesting (an excerpt is provided her with some additional context:)


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.183514/2015.183514.The-Origin-Of-The-War-Of-1914-Vol-11_djvu.txt
	...Still to-day with such an abundance of witnesses and protagonists it is a difficult undertaking to reconstruct the exact lines of the tragedy, because most of them try to hide something or to elude some question or other. There are witnesses who attest something of which they have no knowledge, witnesses who remain dumb or give a false account of what they know, witnesses who add adornments to their statements or are mainly interested in self-justification. None the less by piecing together and sifting the information and impressions received, the present writer has come to an opinion on the origins of the conspiracy and the planning of the outrage which he believes to be substantially correct.

	Let us begin by ascertaining what happened after the outrage and the first results of the preliminary investigation. Together with bombs and revolvers the assassins had brought with them from Belgrade cyanide of potassium so that the one who carried out the deed should commit suicide and thus make sure of not betraying the names of the Other accomplices and above all the origins and instigators of the conspiracy. Obeying their instructions Cabrinovic and Princip swallowed their doses of poison, but it did not do more than cause slight injury to mouth and stomach. Cabrinovic was dragged out of the waters of the MiljaCka into which he had jumped after throwing the bomb and taken to the police first-aid post, where it was soon realized that he was an old acquaintance who had been banished from Sarajevo for five years for socialist opinions. 

	...In December 1937 in the presence of Colonel C. A. Popovid the present writer submitted the text of this interview to Colonel Simid and he confirmed that it was correct in all particulars except for certain formal details, but he assured the present writer that he had never stated that Hartwig knew everything, and that on this point his ideas had been wrongly reported. His opinion was that Hartwig was kept in the dark about the plot but that Artamonov — who sympathized with the Black Hand, to which he had contributed 8,000 francs, and above all with its Dimitrievic, with whom he was in daily co-operation — was fuUy informed of everything. Simid added that he had no idea whom Artamonov could have consulted in St. Petersburg before giving Dimitrievic his reply, but it must have been somebody of more authority than himself, possibly the Russian General Staff, possibly the War Minister Sukhomlinov, possibly some Grand Duke, certainly not Hartwig, because in that case there would not have been a delay of several days before he could give his answer. 

	The present writer does not know for what reason Simid altered his original version seeing that he had not troubled to rectify inaccuracies in his interview with Victor Serge as published in Clarté if inaccuracies there were. It must, however, be added that Giesl, the Austrian Minister at Belgrade, when questioned by the present writer, also replied that he did not believe Hartwig was cognizant of the plot.



https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp
	...A tragic accident in Belgrade may have heightened the dangers that were inherent from the first in Berchtold’s recklessly calculated risk. On July 10, Baron Vladimir von Giesl, the Austrian Minister in Belgrade who had been recalled to Vienna for consultation, returned to his post. At 9 o’clock that evening he received an unexpected call from his Russian opposite number, the redoubtable Nicolas Henrikovitch de Hartwig. The Russian Minister said that he had come to express his condolences “for the atrocious outrage” (Sarajevo), but there were undoubtedly other things that he wanted to say. What they were we shall never know. At 9:20 P.M., just as Giesl was launching into a soothing—and quite false—interpretation of Austria’s attitude toward Serbia, Hartwig suddenly slumped to the floor, unconscious. He was dead when a doctor examined him a few minutes later (he was overweight, and had suffered from angina pectoris for some years). An unpleasant scene ensued after the arrival of Hartwig’s daughter, Ludmilla. She brusquely repulsed the sympathy expressed by the Giesls, and poked about the room, sniffing at an eau de cologne bottle, and rummaging in some large Japanese vases. Her father had smoked only his own Russian cigarettes, but Ludmilla had wrapped up the two butts and put them in her bag. Had her father had anything to eat or drink? she asked with unveiled suspicion. In the tense atmosphere of the time, public rumor immediately made a poisoner of the unfortunate Giesl, who was even accused of having brought back from Vienna an electric chair which instantly killed anyone sitting in it.

	Hartwig had inside knowledge of the Serbian Black Hand and its methods (the Austrians were strangely uninformed on the subject, though the alert French Minister in Belgrade had already been able to ferret out for his government the Black Hand’s role in the Sarajevo assassinations). As was noted in a previous chapter, he is believed to have broken off his originally close relationship with the fanatical brotherhood’s head, Colonel Apis, and in general, to have started putting the brakes on extreme Serbian nationalism, which he had earlier encouraged. His influence on the Serbian government was enormous; if his personal outlook on the Balkan problem had really changed as much as many historians think, his death at that crucial moment was undoubtedly a catastrophe for Europe. Giesl himself believed so. He later wrote that if Hartwig had lived beyond the “critical 25th of July,” the war would not have occurred.



https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.183514/2015.183514.The-Origin-Of-The-War-Of-1914-Vol-11_djvu.txt
	...Knowing the military weakness of Serbia he was opposed to war between Austria and Serbia and to anything that might cause it. Giesl thought, however, that Artamonov may well have been privy to the plot. 

	Artamonov himself, who meanwhile had risen to be a general and in 1937 was living in Belgrade, assured the present writer in answer to an inquiry that from 19 June to 28 July 1914 he was not in Serbia, being on two months’ leave and his place being taken by Staff Captain Alexander Werchovski, an extremely able officer recently posted to Belgrade. Artamonov was at Zuridi when on 29 June he learnt of the outrage. He did not return to his post, but went first to Milan and then to Lovrana. There on 24 July he heard the news of the Austrian ultimatum to Serbia. He rushed to Fiume to telephone to Werchovski who, regarding war as inevitable, had already left for St. Petersburg. Then Artamonov decided to return to Belgrade arriving on 28 July the day of Austria’s declaration of war on Serbia. To Artamonov the present writer submitted Simid’s statements. 

	He declared them to be false and that Dimitrievic never mentioned the outrage to him. Only after the war did he learn that Apis was implicated. They had been on the friendliest terms but had never discussed the impending Austro-Hungarian manoeuvres in Bosnia-PIerzegovina or Francis Ferdinand’s visit to Bosnia. They had never exchanged ideas on what might happen if the Heir Apparent were to die. On the present writer’s remarking that it was strange he should absent himself from Belgrade at the very moment when the Austrian manoeuvres were on the point of beginning on the Bosnian frontier and the Archduke was expected at Sarajevo, Artamonov, after some embarrassed hesitation, said that he had not had any furlough for three years and permission had been given him in the first half of June when he had no idea of what was about to happen. He reiterated that he Knew nothing of the outrage, and that in the little Belgrade of the time, where public life was confined to a very few cafes, the plot could not have been kept secret, and he added: 

		If Austria did not take adequate precautions for the protection of the Archduke’s life, there must have been reasons for it. Perhaps the Sarajevo drama implies a mysterious Hapsburg drama. Probably this is the explanation why Jovan Jovanovid’s approach to Bilinski had no result. 

	When the present writer asked Artamonov for his explanation of the statements made by Dimitrievic to Colonel Simid, his reply was: 

		Perhaps Dragutin Dimitrievic gave this version to attenuate and cover up his own guilt or to boast of influences from high quarters. He was a strong, ambitious man who aimed at gaining complete and unconditional command of the State. His statements to Colonel Simid as to my having agreed to the Sarajevo outrage on one hand whitewashed him for his part in the plot and on the other enhanced his prestige. 

	The present writer must honestly say he remained unconvinced by the behaviour of this officer, who struck him as being of limited intelligence with little strength of character, or by his explanations for his absence from Belgrade even after the outrage. He showed the present writer his note book of June-July 1914, a bald list of Swiss and Italian hotels, giving the room-numbers of the accommodation occupied by himself and his family in each hotel and the account of the day’s expenses and nothing else. No mention of the Sarajevo outrage or Hartwig’s death. Only the top of the page bearing the date 24 July 1914, under the name of his hotel at Lovrana are the words : Austrian ultimatum to Serbia, followed by the usual record of the day’s expenditure beginning with: coffee — 2 lire


Albertini goes for both depth and breadth and his works fill multiple volumes. They are an essential reference for just about any topic on the war.

&nbsp;


https://books.google.com/books?id=2EyJY8uE4WYC&pg=443

http://jmss.org/jmss/index.php/jmss/article/view/420

In general, anything by Herwig on the origins of the war is really good. He goes over all the strange decisions and coincidences that led to the war.

Herwig convincingly argues against the thesis that the world "slid" into an inevitable World War I. Rather, the war was started by the efforts of a small group of officials in each of the belligerents:


	...Beyond continental Europe and the Ottoman Empire, tough, aggressive senior decision makers also charted the course toward war. In Japan, the European war brought relief and joy. What senior leaders termed the great "confusion" would spell opportunity for Japan, an opportunity to become the "chief nation of the Orient." On 8 August 1914, the cabinet approved Japanese participation in the war alongside Great Britain. That decision was the work primarily of one man, Foreign Minister Kato Takaaki. In what Frederick R. Dickinson describes as a "complete usurpation of the foreign policy prerogative," in August 1914, Kato, after consulting with just a handful of his closest advisors in the Foreign Ministry, took the genro, or elder statesmen, completely by surprise. 40 There was no input from the public, the popular press, or financial and industrial circles. And far from being a "slide" into war, Japan's entry into that conflict was the product of the machinations of its foreign minister.

	...Last but not least, the United States entered the war in April 1917 in large measure also because of one man: Woodrow Wilson. Having attempted for the first three years of the war to influence its course and outcome through diplomatic means, the president finally ran out of alternatives after Germany's initiation of unrestricted submarine warfare on 1 February 1917.

	John M. Cooper first examines, and then rejects, the customary arguments of scholars that "powerful forces" such as precedent, economics, culture, geopolitics, and popular opinion brought about the American decision to enter the war. He suggests instead that these "powerful forces" were but "background influences" and that they acted on the side of nonintervention. Rather, "Wilson remains at the center. He and, in certain critical respects, he alone cast America's lot for entry into World War I." With Congress out of session for all but three months between August 1914 and the end of 1915, the president acted on his own, with complete faith in his enormous self-assurance.

	...During the war, arguments of intention, of sinister premeditation were dominant, these basically being arguments of aggressive purpose. A year or two after the end of the war, a sea change occurred and arguments of inadvertence no one wanted war were given increasingly wide approval. Both arguments were basically political in character, serving as an aid first in the conduct of the war, and then in the conduct of the peace. Since little serious documentation was available at that point, the actual bases of the decision making were essentially unknown. The most striking instance of the shift in usages appears in the case of David Lloyd George, who, in a less than a year, changed from a committed intentionalist to become the principal author of the nonjudgmental slide thesis. In January 1920, he demanded that Kaiser Wilhelm II be formally tried as a war criminal, perhaps at Dover Castle. Then, in December of that year, he made a famous speech in which he argued that the nations had "glided, or rather staggered and stumbled" into war. 42 As late as 1936, Lloyd George still maintained, "No sovereign or leading statesman in any of the belligerent countries sought or desired war certainly not a European war.

	...And so it was in 1914. For decades, European leaders had "gamed" the likely scenario for war on the Continent. In each case, they rejected the notion that a war could be localized or isolated. In each case, they recognized the danger of diplomatic escalation leading to armed conflict. In each case, they knew the dangers inherent in a general European war. In each case, they accepted those risks and dangers in July and August, and they decided for war with the full expectation of winning and thereby solving the difficulties that prompted them to consider armed conflict in the first place. That is what made the July Crisis radically different from previous crises, such as the two Moroccan wars, the two Balkan wars, and the Tripolitanian war.

	...In fact, there was a surprising single-mindedness of purpose in the decision makers of 1914. They recognized almost to a man that the strategic argument of perceived decline or threat demanded the call to arms. In short order, the murder of Archduke Franz Ferdinand receded from the forefront of their considerations. Instead, the leaders in Vienna and Berlin, St. Petersburg and Paris, persisted in their view that war alone could resolve their perceived precarious positions in the European concert. And when two monarchs, Wilhelm II and Nicholas II, at the last moment tried to pull back from the precipice, the coteries in Berlin and St. Petersburg forced them back on course.

	...The "slide" thesis is also rendered spurious by the various actions, especially in the three critical capitals Vienna, Berlin, and St. Petersburg to block possible mediation of the crisis. Foreign Minister Berchtold as early as 3 July boldly informed the German ambassador, Heinrich von Tschirschky, of his government's need for a "final and fundamental reckoning" with Serbia. Kaiser Wilhelm II at Berlin endorsed that initiative with the terse marginalia, "now or never." Vienna refused a state funeral for Archduke Franz Ferdinand in part because such a formal gathering might have offered the crowned heads of Europe an opportunity to discuss and perhaps to coordinate their responses to the assassination at Sarajevo. Vienna was determined to strike out against Belgrade; Berlin seconded that initiative. And once Russia had decided to block the proposed Habsburg "punitive expedition" against Serbia by way of mobilization, Foreign Minister Sazonov forestalled further discussion and possible resolution of the crisis by instructing General Ianushkevich, the chief of the General Staff, to smash his telephone!

	Perhaps the last words on the "slide" thesis should go to one of the pivotal players, the chief of the German General Staff. Already in March 1913, General von Moltke confided to the Italian military attache Germany's intention to violate Belgian neutrality in case of war. The next war, Moltke stated, would be between France and Germany. In brutal terms, he allowed that this war would be "a question of life or death for us. We shall stop at nothing to gain our end. In the struggle for existence, one does not bother about the means one employs." 44 And in retirement in June 1915, Moltke in a private letter to Field Marshal Colmar von der Goltz spoke openly of "this war which I prepared and initiated." 45 No drift, no slide.

	...We suggest instead that a more intelligent reading of the events of July 1914 might have caused a different opinion as to whether the entire Balkans were worth the bones of millions of grenadiers Pomeranian or otherwise.


Again, the very idea of blaming any particular country as a whole for the war doesn't hold up to scrutiny; In most of the belligerent governments, one can find a tug-of-war of officials acting to start the war against officials acting to prevent it. Prince Lichnowsky in Germany and Georges Louis in France, for instance, both tried desperately to prevent the outbreak of war, and Lichnowsky's memoirs and Louis biography are certainly worth a read.


&nbsp;


https://archive.org/details/fallofthedynasti012755mbp

Taylor's *Fall of Dynasties* is an indispensable overview of World War One, its origins, and its relation to the Russian Civil war. His overview of the Okhrana's operations in relation to World War I are illuminating and hard to find elsewhere.

Generally, Taylor avoids going into depth for most sub-topics (a necessity for the vast topic he covers), but the information he does provide often gives a deeper understanding of the political workings behind the war than most books provide. To give an example, his treatment of the Okhrana's (Tsarist secret police) relations with French President Poincaré is very helpful for understanding the disastrous military alliance between France and Russia that made World War I possible:


	...The infiltration of the police and the secret-service outlook into the higher policy-making levels of the Czarist state was no less evident in foreign than in domestic affairs. The Okhrana was particularly active in Paris, a major center of émigré revolutionary activities. It operated much as the GPU and the MVD were later to do. The chief agent was usually attached to the Russian Embassy with the rank of counselor; he rendered no accounts to the ambassador but was authorized to correspond with his chiefs through the diplomatic pouch. Co-operation between the Okhrana unit in Paris and the French Sureté was always close in the pre-war years. The Sureté helped one Okhrana official set up a special Franco-Russian organization, disguised as a private-detective agency, to spy on the émigrés. The Okhrana likewise organized, without protest from the French authorities, a French branch of the Russian “patriotic” organizations called the League for the Salvation of the Fatherland, which co-operated with French right-wing extremists like the Royalist Camelots du Roi.

	...To neutralize the chronic protest of French Socialists and Liberals against its operations on French soil, the Okhrana bribed French newspapers and journalists of the right who were willing to follow a pro-Russian line. According to an exposé of the Okhrana written in 1919 by one of its former senior officials, V. K. Agafonov, it financed a journalists’ club in Paris and paid regular subsidies to several important French newspapers, including the Echo de Paris, the Gaulois, and the Figaro. The last-named organ, according to Agafonov, for a while received 24,000 rubles—about $10,000—monthly from the Okhrana.

	When Izvolsky took over the Russian Embassy in Paris he promoted an arrangement with the French government for influencing French opinion that was more official, but hardly less conspiratorial, than the crude undercover operations of the Okhrana: the Russians would open a special credit, drawn upon the Czar’s secret funds, for the French government, which would then undertake to buy up the consciences—and the pens—of its own journalists in behalf of joint objectives. A letter sent by the Russian Prime Minister in October 1912 to his French opposite number—at that time Poincaré—pointed out one of the advantages of the proposed system: It would help keep within bounds “certain appetites and certain rivalries” in the French press which the Russians had learned from bitter experience were apt to be stirred up when they approached foreign journalists directly.

	There was another advantage that the Russian communication did not spell out but which Poincaré may have been able to read between the lines. Izvolsky looked upon the dry, little Lorrainer, with his implacable irredentism, as the heaven-sent instrument of Russian foreign policy in France—“If Poincaré were defeated it would be a catastrophe for us,” he warned St. Petersburg before the French presidential elections of 1913—and one of the secret objectives of the press campaign that Russia was proposing to finance was to combat the “pacifist”—we would say today “appeasement”—and therefore anti-Poincaré, elements in French public life. “Do not forget,” Izvolsky once wrote his nominal chief in St. Petersburg, “that Poincare has to struggle with very influential elements in his own party which are generally hostile to Russia and openly preach that France must not be dragged into any war arising out of Balkan affairs.”


Herwig also writes about how inexplicable the Poincaré government's decision-making was leading up to the war:


https://books.google.com/books?id=2EyJY8uE4WYC&pg=443
	The imperative of French policy in 1914, Eugenia C. Kiesling suggests, was simple and clear: to preserve the tie to St. Petersburg at all cost. France could not afford to "decide" whether to stand by Russia. While Premier Viviani publicly avowed that his policy was to "resolve the conflict ... in the interest of the general peace," he nevertheless described France as "entirely ready to support the action of the [Russian] imperial government. " France's ambassador to St. Petersburg, Paleologue, throughout the July Crisis counseled an aggressive stance on the part of France and Russia, including if need be recourse to war. On 25 July and again on 28 July, Paleologue assured Russian Foreign Minister Sazonov of "unequivocal French support." 25 Poincare's commitment to the Russian alliance was so firm that, in the words of one historian, he pursued it even at the cost of "connivance in dishonesty and blackmail."


Taylor's coverage of Russian Foreign Minister Sergei Sazanov's efforts to convince Tsar Nicholas to mobilize Russian forces during the July Days is likewise illuminating. The whole book is recommended reading for anyone who wants to understand World War I.


&nbsp;


https://web.archive.org/web/20080921175641/https://odci.gov/library/center-for-the-study-of-intelligence/kent-csi/docs/v11i4a07p_0001.htm

Probably anything by Vladimir Burtsev on World War I and the Russian Revolution is good, if you can find it. What's more interesting is what he uncovered. Burtsev was a Russian revolutionary who devoted his work uncovering Okhrana spies who had infiltrated the revolution, all the way up to its leadership. He earned the name "the Sherlock Holmes of the Revolution" and essentially headed their counter-intelligence operations. He opposed Lenin and the Bolsheviks, especially later in the revolution, and uncovered that Roman Malinovksy, Lenin's right-hand man, was a spy for the Okhrana (a charge which Lenin tried to deflect).

The Okhrana claimed their spies infiltrated revolutionary organizations in order to influence them--either to discredit them or provoke them into committing crimes for which they could be turned over to law enforcement. As such, these "agent provocateurs" were a front-and-center problem for the revolution, and much is written about them by the revolutionaries. Communist and historian Bertram Wolfe writes of the extent of the Tsarist police's infiltration of the revolutionary movement:


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.276141/2015.276141.Three-Who_djvu.txt
	Though less ruthless and thorough in the suppression of opponents, and enormously less numerous than the GPU to which we have become accustomed, the Okhrana was second to no other secret political police of its day. Where peasant risings and mutinies gave it the pretext, it proclaimed martial law and used gallows and firing squad. In other provinces, it made use of the power of administrative deportation without trial, up to a maximum of five years in Siberia. But a roster of millions of prisoners in concentration camps would have seemed an incredible nightmare to this little band of routine-incrusted police officials. According to the testimony of its chief, Vasiliev, at the height of its power it never had more than one thousand secret agents in all Russia, nor more than one hundred in the capital. He complains that he had "very few” operatives abroad and, every time a congress was held in foreign parts, had to further debilitate his Moscow and Petersburg forces by sending some of his best agents. 

	But, with its years of political experience, the Okhrana sensed earlier than Lenin the nature of the new political situation, and prepared, too, to “go underground” once more. With forces that seem numerically so modest today, it now developed a system of espionage that eclipsed even the Zubatov and Gapon experiments. If, at every stage of our story so far we have found a police agent in the midst of each fairly numerous gathering, now we shall find them penetrating into the topmost secret hierarchies of the Social Revolutionary Party and the Bolshevik faction of the Social Democratic Party. 



In practice, however, the Okhrana often did more to hurt the Tsarist regime than protect it. The head of the Socialist Revolutionaries terrorist operations, Evno Azef, was uncovered by Burtsev as an Okhrana spy; at the same time, Azef was assassinating key Russian officials. Taylor does a good job of illustrating how hard Azef's actions would have been to explain to the rest of the Tsarist government:


	The Okhrana’s relations with the out-and-out terrorist groups were no less equivocal than its relations with the Social Democrats. For many years the head of the Social Revolutionary assassination squads, a bearded, appropriately villainous-looking individual named Evno Azev, was the Okhrana’s star undercover agent Unquestionably he was strategically placed: the most formidable terrorist organization in Russia could not plan a murder without the Okhrana receiving warning in advance. There was, of course, one slight drawback to the arrangement: if Azev were not allowed a reasonable quota of assassinations his professional reputation might suffer, and eventually the terrorists would replace him with a more efficient and reliable killer. On the other hand there was a feeling in some police circles that Azev had been allowed perhaps a little too much scope when in 1904 he helped plan the murder of his own employer, Minister of the Interior V. K. Plehve; the feeling grew sharper the following year when Azev’s associates blew up the Czar’s uncle, Grand Duke Serge in Moscow. Strictly speaking, Azev was not to blame for this outrage; he had reported it in good time for preventing it, but the Okhrana, apparently fearing to expose a useful agent by being too explicit, had passed on to the local authorities a warning, so vague as to be worthless.

	When Azev later reported a plot to assassinate the Czar himself, General Guerassimov decided that to avoid any further slips he would personally take over the management of his talented but redoubtable agent Thanks to this high-level supervision the plot was eventually foiled without damage either to the Czar or to Azev. Eventually Azev was exposed, but he was never brought to justice. When the scandal became serious the Okhrana helped him to escape abroad, where he remained in genteel retirement until his death in 1918.


Other "agent provocateurs" would organize worker's strikes and protests against the Tsar. Taylor writes:


	On occasion the Okhrana organized escapes and prison breaks to build the “cover” of its agents, and though it clung to the fiction that these were merely passive informants, many of them were agents provocateurs in the most literal sense. Though the investigating committee set up under the Kerensky regime could not find documentary proof that the Okhrana had deliberately instigated street demonstrations and rebellions, there is a wealth of informed testimony that it did so, notably in the great Moscow uprising of 1905 and in similar bloody disorders in Kronstadt and Viborg.


One of the most famous of these, the 1905 protests at the Winter Palace calling for better working conditions and an end to the Russo-Japanese war, was led and organized by another police agent, Father Gapon. The imperial guard and uniformed police attacked and killed hundreds of the protesters as Gapon fled, a massacre that essentially constituted police agents leading civilians to be slaughtered by other police. At best, the "Bloody Sunday" massacre represented an egregious failure to communicate among the Tsarist intelligence, police and military. Whatever the cause, the Okhrana's actions further galvanized public opinion against the Tsar.

The Bloody Sunday massacre is part of a larger pattern of police provocations that tended to energize revolutionary movements and turn public opinion against the Russian monarchy. In the late 19th century the Okhrana funded the *People's Will*, the magazine of the radical Russian terrorist organization with the same name. During the Russian revolution, the Okhrana funded *Pravda*, the mouthpiece of the Bolsheviks, and at the time of its founding employed multiple agents among its editorial staff. Both of these publications encouraged revolutionary violence and extremism, as did the speeches of Malinovksy, which he would send to the Okhrana for approval before delivering them to the Duma--a fact often cited to illustrate the Okhrana's duplicity. Tsarist *provocateurs* also made it their priority to aide the Bolsheviks over other revolutionary organizations, a strategy which Okhrana officials claimed would divide the Russian revolutionaries so they could be more easily controlled and discredited.

What exactly these *provocateurs* were thinking constitute some of the greatest mysteries of the Russian revolution, and Burtsev's detective work often uncovered more mysteries than he solved. Azef's assassination of Plehve, for instance, allowed Pyotr Sviatopolk-Mirsky to take over as Minister of the Interior and paved the way for Bloody Sunday, and Azef would go on to assassinate Gapon a little over a year after Gapon led the Bloody Sunday protesters to massacre at the hands of the military and police. Burtsev's unmasking of Dr. Zhitomirsky, another Okhrana agent and close confident of Lenin, likewise raised more questions than answers, particularly regarding Lenin's handling of the matter:


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.276141/2015.276141.Three-Who_djvu.txt
	...If we were to list only the more important spies that had so far entered intimately into the life of Vladimir Ilyich, that list would include Gurovich, who financed the first legal Marxist organ, Nachalo , with police funds; the surgeon dentist N. N. Mikhailov, who turned in Ulyanov, Martov and the other organizers of the underground League for Struggle at the end of 1895; Dr. Jacob Zhitomirsky, who, as Lenin’s confidential agent in Berlin, made the arrangements for Kamo and his case of dynamite, for Krassin’s counterfeit banknote paper, and for Litvinov’s and other arrests in connection with the disposal of the five-hundred-ruble notes of the Tiflis holdup. So well did he work that Lenin continued to consider him as a “man of confidence,” to be used for the most delicate tasks. After the Berlin arrests, Zhitomirsky moved “for safety” to France, whence he visited Geneva in 1909 to urge Vladimir Ilyich to move to Paris, “a large city where there will be less spying.” Writes Krupskaya: “The argument was convincing to Ilyich.” Thus the shadowed moved in order to be closer to his shadow. 

	In 1911, Zhitomirsky finally fell under suspicion, but it was not his chief who suspected him. Lenin received a warning from Vladimir Burtsev. Now warnings from Burtsev were no small matter, for he was a self-constituted, one-man, counter-espionage agency. As some collect coins or stamps orieminine conquests, he collected spies. He it was who had shortly before exposed the incomparable Azev, director of the Fighting Section of the Social Revolutionary Party. Yet so sure was Lenin of his most trusted agent that he ignored the warning. 

	A revolutionary bloodhound by vocation, Burtsev, once he had scented a spy, was not to be put off the trail. By 1913 he had gathered so much evidence that he sent Lenin an ultimatum. He would create a public scandal if trust were not withdrawn from this man. “If my charges are false, let him haul me before a revolutionary tribunal. There he will prove his innocence or I my charges.” 

	Alarmed at last, Lenin sent another “man of confidence” to take up the Zhitomirsky matter with Burtsev, and, at the same time, to discuss the whole problem of combatting the spies with which the Bolshevik movement was now obviously infested. The man whom Lenin sent was Roman Malinovsky! 

	Malinovsky questioned Burtsev with strained interest. Who in the police or the government was giving him his secret tips? what reasons had he for suspecting Dr. Zhitomirsky? how could the Bolsheviks judge the reliability of such grave charges unless they were given the sources? what other Bolsheviks did he suspect? Insistently, Malinovsky pleaded that Burtsev communicate “in strict confidence” his sources in the government.


Burtsev's detective work (often aided by outside tips, anonymous or otherwise) resulted in the discovery of hundreds of police informers and *provocateurs* among the revolutionaries' ranks. Of course, these are only the agents we know about; trying to pick-apart exactly who was working for the Tsarist police, the Bolsheviks, or both, and what their motives were is perhaps the most fascinating and important task in understanding the Russian Revolution and, arguably, World War I as a whole.

Burtsev can often be found near the center of such intrigues. When General Kornilov staged a coup against the Russian provisional government (the infamous "Kornilov affair"), Kerensky, then the head of the provisional government, called on the Bolsheviks for support and provided them with arms, setting the stage for Bolsheviks' own coup a few months later. Burtsev, however, uncovered that Kornilov had acted with the full knowledge and agreement of Kerensky (a charge Kerensky would spend some time disputing in his memoirs).

Burtsev developed a reputation as a meticulous and feared investigator, and this reputation alone could drag potentially unscrupulous actors into unwanted scrutiny. After the provisional government replaced the Tsar, Burtsev was tasked with inspecting the police archives of the old regime. Kerensky, however, opposed Burtsev's appointment and sought to replace him, despite Burtsev's reputation as the premier expert in the crimes of the Tsarist secret police. As the historian Robert Henderson writes:


	The liberal-patriotic weekly Petrograd Gazette, for example, splashed his portrait over a whole page under the banner headline: ‘Unmasker of Secret Police and Provocateurs’, with the following brief report: ‘V. L. Burtsev, the famous writer and political activist, is renowned for exposing the Azefovshchina so zealously cultivated by Stolypin. Currently, by order of the Provisional Government, Burtsev is systematizing the affairs of the secret police, the Gendarmerie, and the Department of the Police.’ And indeed, with every passing day, the Komissiia Burtseva (Burtsev Commission), as it became known, would emerge from its labours in the archives with the scalp of yet another traitorous revolutionary, student or journalist. But evidently, such successes did not find favour with Kerensky, the new Minister of Justice, who called Burtsev’s reliability into question believing he was simply not cut out for such systematic duties. Within three days of his appointment, Kerensky was already attempting to undermine the new commissioner, writing to Burtsev’s former co-editor Pavel Shchegolev and others, asking them to bypass Burtsev, examine the Department of Police documents themselves and report back directly to Kerensky. Indeed, according to Sergei Svatikov, both Kerensky and Shchegolev attempted to prevent Burtsev from gaining access to the police archives.

	...The commission managed to limp on for another three months until mid-June, when Kerensky succeeded in having it replaced by another body under Shchegolev’s official chairmanship.


(It should be noted that Henderson's biography of Burtsev is a good reference but more biased than a history book should be--Henderson spends too much ink and paper comparing Burtsev to Don Quixote, but it is the opinion of the author that if you are reading Burtsev's works now, his efforts were far from being in vain.)

Kerensky formally liquidated the "Burtsev Commission" in March 1917, and Burtsev's work remains much of what we know about the Okhrana's operations during World War I:


https://translate.google.com/translate?sl=ru&tl=en&js=y&prev=_t&hl=en&ie=UTF-8&u=http%3A%2F%2Fwww.universalinternetlibrary.ru%2Fbook%2F70296%2Fchitat_knigu.shtml&edit-text=&act=url
	At the end of February - beginning of March 1917, almost simultaneously throughout Russia, fires burned, in which the documents of the Security Departments, the Gendarmerie Directorates, the Police Department and other services of the Ministry of the Interior of the Empire burned. The flame was absorbing priceless documents.

	In the first days of the February Revolution, enraged crowds of metropolitan residents set fire to the District Court building on Liteiny Prospekt and the old prison, the Lithuanian Castle, near the Theater Square. They burned to the ground. The fires broke out in the building of the Police Department on the Fontanka near the Panteleymonovsky Bridge and on Mytninskaya Embankment, where the Petrograd Security Department was smashed and burned. These two buildings with their contents were set on fire intentionally. Many wanted to exterminate the archives of the Security Department and the Special Department of the Police Department, they needed oblivion of the past as a guarantee of future existence.

	"True, here and there the gendarmerie officers managed to destroy lists of provocateurs," wrote the publicist SG Svatikov, "in some places a crowd, instigated by security agents, did not understand the meaning of what was happening, defeated the Security Departments and burned their archives and records. For example, a significant part of the archives of the Petrograd security department perished".

	All those who left memories of these strange fires of the spring of 1917 believed that their former guards had organized them.

	"Before the building of the Police Department," wrote the well-known archivist V. Maksakov, "huge fires of papers, documents, deeds, photographic cards thrown from the windows burned day and night on the Fontanka and Panteleymonovskaya street. In the room most of the cabinets were hacked, and books, files, individual papers piles covered the floors of a huge building. Some departments, for example, VIII office work, which dealt with cases of combating crime, were completely destroyed. Others suffered considerably. Fortunately, the room in which the Special Section of the Police Department was located did not suffer much. Here were the most valuable materials in the historical sense. They have been preserved almost completely ".

	Someone reported on what was happening on the Fontanka in the Pushkin House of the Academy of Sciences. The indispensable secretary of the Academy of Sciences, Academician SF Oldenburg, was able to obtain several wagons, and an expedition consisting of PE Shchegolev, BL Modzalevsky, tl. A. Kotlyarevsky, A. S. Polyakov, A. A. Shilov, V. P. Semennikov and others, went to save the most valuable archives. All that was saved, on March 3, was loaded into a sleigh and taken to the Vasilievsky Island to the Academy of Sciences. (Some of the saved documents were lost in 1918 when the archives were evacuated to Yaroslavl.)

	In Moscow on March 1, 1917 in the palace along Gnezdnikovsky Lane, 5, bonfires flamed. Documents of the Security Department were burning. Someone wore papers in the bonfires, someone took for a folder, photos, brochures. "It was difficult to understand," wrote Maksakov, "who was more in this crowd," curious or former guards who aspired, as late as possible, to conceal in the fire of fires their traces of participation in the protection of the failed autocratic system. That there were a lot of former guards in the crowd could be seen from the fact that when checking the cases of the "secret police", especially its so-called "secret service department," it was subsequently found out that the lack of mainly personal files of secret employees, "agent notes" such documents, apparently, not accidentally disappeared during the "spontaneous" rout of the "secret police" and police stations.

	On the same day, a group of politicians and historians organized the protection of the documents of the "secret police" and their transportation to Red Square to the Moscow Historical Museum, where the reading room of the museum was adapted to accommodate archival materials ".

	The situation was much worse in the provinces. There, the security offices burned simultaneously with the capital, first of all they destroyed personal affairs of secret employees and normative documents regulating the methods of the political investigation. News of the widespread destruction of the detective institutions of the former empire prompted the Provisional Government to urgently establish a Commission under the Ministry of Justice to liquidate the political affairs of the former Police Department. It was headed by the former Narodovolets VL Burtsev, who paid very little time to the Commission, which left part of the archives in the custody of their former custodians, officials of the Ministry of Internal Affairs. The Provisional Government "ordered the protection of police archives only when the official custodians left their posts and when many documents had already been plundered and destroyed".

	Seeing that the Burtsov Commission is inactive, on March 13, 1917, the Minister of Justice signed a letter with the following content:

	"I propose to Comrade Prosecutor Sluchevsky, PE Shchegolev, VM Zenzinov, NN Myasoyedov and Ensign Znamensky to review in the shortest possible time the documents seized in the Police Department and other institutions at my disposal and the results inform me.

	Minister of Justice AF Kerensky ".


Burtsev's investigations extended beyond the Russian revolution. It was he who uncovered the famous "Willy Nicky telegrams" (https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/The_Willy-Nicky_Telegrams), shattering the Bolshevik propaganda narrative that it was the monarchs who started the war (historians like Albertini and Herwig would later show the war was started by small group of officials in each belligerent state, with their respective monarchs generally being strung along). And it was he who unmasked the French socialite Arkadiy Harting as a "miserable little provocateur" (in the words of historian Ben Fischer) for the Okhrana, a blow from which the Paris Okhrana never recovered. Nor could Harting's case officer, Pytor Rachkovsky, escape the snare of Burtsev's meticulous investigations; following the war, Burtsev uncovered that Rachkovsky, who's Paris intrigues helped secure the disastrous Franco-Russian military alliance that made World War I such a bloody mess, also forged *The Protocols of the Elders of Zion*, a conspiratorial text that blamed the war on a secretive cabal of Jews, who were subject to rampant and sometimes violent antisemitism at the time and often blamed for society's ills.

After the war, Burtsev devoted his remaining years to countering Nazi propaganda.


&nbsp;



https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt

The German government's support for the Russian revolution are a huge piece of the puzzle of understanding World War I, and the the archives of the German Foreign Ministry's communications regarding this support are one of the best primary sources available. From the start, the German High Command, the Foreign Ministry, and Chancellor Hollweg (who was in close contact with the Foreign Ministry) showed that they knew Germany had slim chances to win the war, even as many of them acted to start it:


https://books.google.com/books?id=nAFfAr3dU_8C&pg=PA79&lpg=PA79
	The press and popular feeling played on the inevitability of a clash between Teuton and Slav. This emotive vocabulary did not seem inappropriate given the reality of the position. The Russian army's budget--independently of the extraordinary capital grants--had grown from 406 million roubles in 1907/8 to 581 million in 1913/14. Spending on the navy nearly tripled over the same period, and in 1914 exceeded that of Germany. In 1913 the Russians introduced the 'grand programme', enacted in 1914, which aimed to increase the annual contingent of recruits for the army from 455,000 to 585,000, and to expand the total number of divisions from 114.5 to 112.5. The Russian war minister accompanied these enlargements with statements calculated to stoke German anxieties. The German and Austro-Hungarian armies were already inferior to those of France and Russia by over a million men in the sumer of 1914; by 1917 the Russian army alone would be three times the Size of Germany's. The argument that, objectively, there was no chance of a Russian challenge in economic terms did not figure in the calculations on the military balance. By 1914 French loans had enabled the construction of strategic railways so that Russia's mobilization could be accelerated, and the first troops be into battle within fifteen days. German plans drawn up on 1905 rested on the then-valid assumption that Germany would have six weeks in which to deal with France before turning east: the very existence of that planning assumption, which by 1913 was demonstrably wrong, added to Germany's sense of panic. In may 1914, therefore, Moltke's advocacy of a preventative war took on greater urgency, if not more precision: 'we must wage a preventative war', he told Gottlieb von Jagow, the foreign minister, 'to conquer our opponents as long as we still have a reasonable chance in this struggle.'

	Both Jagow and Bethmann Hollweg resisted Moltke's suggestion. But the case for doing so seemed, in the self-absorbed atmosphere of Wilhelmine politics, to be growing weaker. As early as December 1912 Bethmann--who had visited Russia in that year--confessed: 'One must have a good deal of trust in God and count on the Russian revolution as an ally in order to be able to sleep at all.'


The unfurling of this risky strategy of "counting on the Russian revolution," as Hollweg put it, can be seen in the archives of the German Foreign Ministry. After the battle of Marne, German leadership predicated that it was only a matter of time before the Russian military would overwhelm Germany on the Eastern front. Germany, at best, would be forced to end the war on unfavorable terms. To prevent this, German leadership hoped to secure a peace treaty with Russia separate from the Entente (a "separate peace"), or at least--from reading between the lines for some of the Foreign Ministry's communications--to destabilize Russia enough internally that their external military might would falter.

Such was the impetus for the Foreign Ministry to support Lenin and his Bolsheviks:


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Austro-Hungarian Foreign Minister to the Chancellor 

	Vienna, 10 November 1917 

	...Lenin could then easily make advances towards a separate peace with us within the terms of his programme, and could proceed to the conclusion of an armistice. Since the Maximalists' programme includes the concession of the right to self-determination of the non-Russian peoples of Russia, the question of what should finally be done with Congress Poland, Courland, Livonia, and Finland could well be left to be decided in the course of peace negotiations. It would be our business to ensure that the desire for separation from Russia and for political and economic dependence on the Central Powers be voiced from within these nations. In view of what I have said, I therefore believe that we could influence the development of the situation in Russia favourably to our aims


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Minister in Stockholm to the Foreign Ministry

	2 May 1917

	Herr von Heidenstam considers that report is very likely true, as both the political line Lenin is pursuing and his peace propaganda are completely independent, and he is thus now in a position of violent opposition to the government. According to a report received today from the Telegram Bureau, he has been summoned before the Workers' Council for this reason. 

	There have been large demonstrations in favour of peace, led by students, in front of Kazan cathedral, at which violent speeches were made against England and the United States, and more moderate ones against France. The assassination of General Katshalinski is considered significant because he was a spokesman of the new government. 

	Anarchy is on the increase. Lucius 


Lenin and Bolshevik propaganda openly declared their opposition to the war, distaste for France and England, and desire to violently overthrow the Tsarist government. Lenin, then, appeared to be the perfect tool for the panicked German leadership--should the Bolsheviks seize power, Lenin would face tremendous political pressure to fulfill his promises to quickly end the war, which was deeply unpopular with the Russian people. And even if the Bolsheviks failed to overthrow the Russian government, the attempt alone would have a destabilizing effect, surely aided by the Bolsheviks' extremist anti-war and anti-Entente propaganda. Whether this was a wise plan or not, the Foreign Ministry pursued it eagerly. According to Der Speigel:


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
	... For four years Berlin supported the Bolsheviks and other revolutionaries in Russia with [money], ammunition, and weapons, thereby contributing to the end of the tsar monarchy. The German Foreign Office alone spent at least 26 million marks, according to today's value of around 75 million euros, by the end of 1917.

	...Thus a money-boom went down to the numerous political adventurers who reported themselves to the German authorities after the outbreak of war. Supposed and actual tsarist adversaries boasted that they could incite mutiny on the Russian Black Sea Fleet, provoke uprisings in the Ukraine, or stir up social unrest.

	It was a lucrative business also for possible braggers. For a "general revolution against Russia", the Foreign Office paid in September 1914 to two men of "great influence" 50,000 marks in gold. Another 2 million in cash should follow at the insurrection - until today no one knows who received the funds. Later the premiums even rose; German diplomats and secret service agents offered millions for a rebellion in a single government of the Tsar empire alone. 

	...Among historians there is broad agreement that it was easier for the Bolsheviks to overthrow the rotten Provisional Government than to assert the power and to enforce it throughout Russia. The state administration collapsed after the October Revolution, but there was a shortage of all necessities: grain, coal, clothing. In northern Russia, also in Siberia and in the southern parts of the former czar empire, opponents of the new regime were gathering. Soon the once great power of Anarchy and the Civil War sank.

	The imperial empire under William II, on the one hand, contributed to the chaos, for German troops occupied considerable parts of the former tzar empire. But at the same time the diplomats of His Majesty invested millions to keep the Bolsheviks in Central Russia in power, because only these were ready to accept a German victory-peace, and because no one in Berlin believed that a real socialism would come to its feet.

	"The Bolsheviks are great fellows, and have made everything very beautiful and well done so far," wrote Diplomat Kurt Riezler, who at that time decisively determined the German policy on Russia.

	It is unlikely to be clear how much money the imperial Germany at the end of 1917 gave the Bolsheviks. There was no doubt that there were considerable amounts. In the archive of the Federal Foreign Office you can find an amazing document. On November 25, 1917, the Foreign Minister's liaison officer telegraphed to Berlin at the headquarters in Bad Kreuznach:

		"The current Petersburg government is struggling with great difficulties, banks denying it any financial support that their government needs urgently to obtain the food for the people and the army ... Is it possible for her to meet the urgently needed money of the difficulties and her slogan in the people and the army, it will be able to hold itself until the armistice is closed, which is what Lenin has recognized, so he turns to us ... Supreme Army leadership considers it highly desirable if the Lenin government succeeds in making money. "

	The Federal Foreign Office backed out: "Further financial support for the Bolsheviks is needed." A few days later, Riezler maintained that the Bolsheviks "now have money". 


Through the Bolshevik agent Helphand (also known as Parvus) and other intermediaries, the Foreign Ministry provided the Bolsheviks with funds and at various points helped distribute their propaganda. Germany secured transport to Russia for numerous Russian revolutionaries in exile, including, famously, Lenin himself, a decision that went to the highest levels of the German government--including Chancellor Hollweg and General von Ludendorff.

It's worthwhile to note that while Germany's situation in 1915 made supporting the Bolshevik revolution appear to be their only option, funding from a hostile foreign country might have truly been the Bolshevik's only option to support their movement. The Bolsheviks were not especially popular in Russia (or abroad), and for obvious reasons would have had difficulties taking funds from the wealthy Russian elite. This point was not lost on the German Foreign Ministry:


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Minister in Copenhagen to the Chancellor 
	
	21 December 1915 
	
	Dr. Helphand, who returned from Berlin yesterday, visited me today and gave me his report on the results of his journey. He emphasized that he had been extremely civilly received in all the most important government offices, and that he had been given the definite impression that his suggestions had found approval with authoritative circles, both in the Foreign Ministry and in the Treasury.
	
	...Dr. Helphand continued by saying that about 20 million roubles would be required to get the Russian revolution completely organized. This total could not possibly be distributed at once, as there would then be a danger of its source being discovered. However, in view of the fact that the beginning of the action was imminent, he had suggested at the Foreign Ministry that the sum of one million roubles should at once be put at the disposal of his confidential agent. This confidential agent entirely shared his view that the revolution would be set in motion about 9-22 January and that, even if it did not immediately take hold of the whole country, it would certainly prevent any return to stable conditions from taking place. In 1905 the bourgeois parties had supported the revolution and had voluntarily paid the wages of the striking workers. Now, however, the bourgeoisie was unfavourable to the movement and the revolutionary committee was therefore forced to bear the entire cost.


The Foreign Ministry apparently failed to realize, however, that such an arrangement created an incentive for the Bolsheviks to prolong the war--at Germany's expense, of course. Should the war have ended in a quick general peace, the Bolshevik's funding, and so their revolution, would have been cut short. On top of that, Russian frustration with their government increased with weariness with the war, driving more citizens to revolutionary organizations like the Bolsheviks. Accordingly, Lenin opposed the Stockholm Conference (https://books.google.com/books?id=vSHuCgAAQBAJ&pg=PA514&lpg=PA514
, https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/aug/17bcca.htm), an international socialist effort to end the war without annexations or indemnities, and there are some indications that well-placed agents with Bolshevik sympathies in Russia and abroad acted to prolong the war in more subtle ways.

As the German leadership's dreams of a sympathetic Bolshevik regime in Russia grew more bold, it may have been that Lenin's very existence helped to prolong the war--after all, if German officials believed they were about to turn a two front war into a one front war with the Bolshevik revolution, why bother negotiating for a general peace before then? In any event, Lenin did little to shake suspicions that he was a German agent (a charge levied independently by both Burtsev and Kerensky's government), and the German Foreign Ministry themselves may have come to see Lenin as a sort-of agent of theirs:


https://archive.org/stream/Germany-and-Revolution-in-Russia-1915-1918/GermanyAndRevolutionInRussia1915-1918-DocumentsFromArchivesOfGermanForeignMinistry_djvu.txt
	The Under State Secretary to the Minister in Stockholm and to the Minister in Bern 

	Berlin, 10 May 1917 

	1. TELEGRAM NO. 666 

	Please let loose, through your agent, agitation for publication of military and political agreements made with France and England by old regime in Russia before the war.

	Stumm 

	2. telegram no. 56 i 

	Please draw the attention of the emigres returning to Russia, through suitable agents, to the idea that they should demand from their government the publication of agreements made by the old Russian regime with England and France.

	Stumm 


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/may/14.htm
	V. I.   Lenin
	War and Revolution
	A LECTURE DELIVERED MAY 14 (27), 1917

	...The treaties which the other Allies have are all the same. They wouldn’t have started to subjugate nations if they had not had these treaties. To know their contents you do not have to burrow in special journals. It is sufficient to recollect the basic facts of economic and diplomatic history. For decades Austria has been after the Balkans with an eye to subjugation. And if they have clashed it is because they couldn’t help clashing. That is why, when the masses demand that these treaties should be published, a demand that is growing more insistent every day, ex-Minister Milyukov and the present Minister Tereshchenko (one in a government without socialist ministers, the other in a government with a number of near-socialist ministers) declare that publication of the treaties would mean a break with the Allies.

	Obviously, you can’t publish the treaties because you are all participants in the same gang of robbers.


The truth, however, is almost certainly more complicated: even if Lenin, Helphand, and some of their comrades were willing to act like German agents and take their money, it became clear that the Bolsheviks had little sympathy for the German monarchy once they took power. The German Marxist Rosa Luxemburg, a friend of Helphand, had even begun pro-communist agitation in Germany years before the war's end. And, curiously, the Tsarist secret police didn't seem to be alarmed by the Bolsheviks' German support:


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
	...Walter Nicolai, the German intelligence chief, Lenin wrote "to provide my intelligence service with valuable information about the conditions in ... Tsarist Russia."

	Above all, the network that Helphand raised after the conversation with Lenin speaks against the theory of Bolshevik innocence. For at the junctions there are always leading revolutionaries of the Lenin party. Moissej Urizki, later head of the Petrograd secret police (Cheka), worked for Helphand; also Jakob Fürstenberg, one of the closest confidants of Lenin, and after the October Revolution head of the Soviet National Bank, or the discreet attorney Mieczyslaw Koslowski, who co-founded the Cheka. They knew each other and Parvus from the exile, and were often related to each other, which increased the willingness to loyalty and secrecy.

	...The tsarist secret police also showed astonishingly well-informed information as it emerged from documents discovered by the publicist Elisabeth Heresch in Moscow, and published under the title "Secrets of Parvus, The Revolution Purchased."


Lenin's government began fomenting socialist uprisings in Germany almost immediately after the war--an outcome entirely predictable for a movement that preaches global revolution--as well as bringing other sorts of misery to Germany.


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
	In the end, Wilhelm's generals did not even dare to relocate soldiers from the Ukraine or the Baltic to the Western Front because the men were meanwhile regarded as unreliable: they sympathized with Lenin's revolution. A request from the Bolsheviks to have 20,000 machine guns, 200,000 rifles, and 500 million cartridges was rejected by the Supreme Command, saying that there was a danger that the weapons "might later be used against us."

	For Lenin calculated as coolly as the Foreign Office, and while he cooperated with the Empire in Moscow during the summer, he spared neither money nor expense to support those comrades in the Reich who were aiming for a German Soviet republic. 




&nbsp;


As the war progressed, World War One became disastrously unpopular for the belligerent countries. In Russia, the labor shortage from conscription led to food shortages, and the Russian government, already struggling from a weakened economy, resorted to printing money to fund the war, bringing inflation of nearly 400 percent. Popular discontent with the government grew, and the Bolsheviks and other Russian socialists readily channeled this dissent into support for their cause:


http://alphahistory.com/worldwar1/russian-revolution/
	The effects of World War I gave rise to the Russian Revolution of 1917. By the end of 1916, two years of total war had placed enormous strain on all combatant nations. None felt this more severely than Russia, which had entered the war confident but in a precarious political, economic and social state. The Russian economy made great industrial advances in the two decades prior to 1914, but it was still under-developed and ill-equipped to supply a prolonged war. Russia’s government was still dominated by the tsarist autocracy, which claimed political authority that was divine rather than popular. The Russian people were already fractious, dissatisfied and eager for change. In 1905 their demands had taken the empire to the brink of revolution, before tensions were eased with promises of reform – promises that were never truly fulfilled. The Russian empire rested on what historian Orlando Figes called ‘unstable pillars’, and they were unable to sustain its involvement in one of the most intense wars in history.


https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1917/sep/06.htm
	V. I. Lenin
	Lessons of the Revolution

	...The people want peace. Yet the revolutionary government of free Russia has resumed the war of conquest on the basis of those very same secret treaties which ex-Tsar Nicholas II concluded with the British and French capitalists so that the Russian capitalists might plunder other nations. Those secret treaties remain unpublished. The government of free Russia resorted to subterfuges, and to this day has not proposed a just peace to all nations.

	There is no bread. Famine is again drawing near. Everybody sees that the capitalists and the rich are unscrupulously cheating the treasury on war deliveries (the war is now costing the nation fifty million rubles daily), that they are raking in fabulous profits through high prices, while nothing whatsoever has been done to establish effective control by the workers over the production and distribution of goods. The capitalists are becoming more brazen every day; they are throwing workers out into the street, and this at a time when the people are suffering from shortages.

	...As to land, wait until the Constituent Assembly. As to the Constituent Assembly, wait until the end of the war. As to the end of the war, wait until complete victory. That is what it comes to. The capitalists and landowners, having a majority in the government, are plainly mocking at the peasants.

	...It goes without saying that the Soviets could and should have taken over state power in full. Pending the convocation of the Constituent Assembly there should have been no other power in the state but the Soviets. Only then would our revolution have become a truly popular and truly democratic revolution. Only then could the working people, who are really striving for peace, and who really have no interest in a war of conquest, have begun firmly and resolutely to carry out a policy which would have ended the war of conquest and led to peace.



http://alphahistory.com/worldwar1/russian-revolution/
	...In different times, the departure of tsarism might have paved the way for a brighter future for Russia. The Provisional Government that replaced the tsarist regime did introduce some liberal reforms, like freedoms of assembly and the press, and amnesties for political prisoners. But facing international pressure, it refused to end Russian involvement in the war. The defeats, military follies, casualty lists and food shortages continued, and after six months the Provisional Government’s popularity had slumped. In October 1917 a new political force, the socialist Bolshevik Party, emerged to seize control of the nation. Led by Vladimir Ulyanov, or Lenin, the Bolsheviks promised ‘peace, bread and land’ – promises that resonated with Russian workers, soldiers and sailors. Once in power the Bolsheviks commenced peace negotiations with Germany and, in March 1918, they signed the Treaty of Brest-Litovsk, formally ending Russia’s involvement in the war. It would prove a costly peace: Russia had to surrender large amounts of territory, people and fertile farmland. World War I had killed off one of Europe’s oldest monarchies and gave birth to a new political phenomenon: socialist dictatorship – which later came to deliver its own share of death, deprivation and human suffering.



&nbsp;


There's a lot more I wanted write about in detail, but I've been sick and it's been hard for me to focus, so I'm not sure when I'll be able to finish it.

Other interesting things that I wanted to put in here include:


...


The German revolution, unrest in France, Italy, and the U.S. and around the world. The war was unpopular everywhere, and governments around the world continued the war against the wishes and best interests of workers, soldiers, and other citizens, which galvanized them in opposition to their governments:


https://www.britannica.com/place/Italy/World-War-I-and-fascism
	The war was deeply unpopular both among the troops—mostly conscripted peasants who were undernourished and fighting for a cause few could understand—and among the civilian population back home, which included almost one million workers in arms factories who were also subject to military discipline. Many rebelled within the army. (It has been estimated that some 470,000 conscripts resisted call-up, 310,000 committed acts of indiscipline under arms, and 300,000 deserted.) More than one million soldiers came before military tribunals before a postwar amnesty was granted. Many once again saw the Italian state only as a repressive institution. Antiwar disturbances struck Milan in May 1917, and serious bread riots took place among the industrial workers of Turin in August 1917. Troops occupied Turin and took four days to restore order; some 50 demonstrators and 10 soldiers were killed in the clashes.



The Bolsheviks were quick to take advantage of this in Russia and elsewhere:


https://books.google.com/books?id=jYdgAwAAQBAJ&pg=PT264
	...The example of the soviets encouraged radical industrial militants everywhere to see their local power as a means of pressing for peace. The most serious popular upheaval of the war in Italy, the insurrection in Turin in August 1917, was partly triggered by a visiting delegation from the Petrograd Soviet, greeted by 40,000 Turinese socialists and metalworkers crying, 'Long live the Russian Revolution, long live Lenin!' Although caused by bread shortages and bitter hostility over industrial discipline, the Turin rising rapidly adopted the demand for peace. In France, where the political culture of labour drew on a broad revolutionary tradition, the Russian Revolution strengthened the tendency for economic and political protest, including the demand for peace, to be expressed in revolutionary language and imagery. 'The Russian Revolution has occurred just when the peoples [of Europe] are weary of spilling their blood to satisfy the appetites of the Tsar, the Kaiser, and Poincare' declared the French socialist deputy and Kienthal signatory Pierre Brizon in March 1917. 'The revolutionaries will impose peace, which will bring the regeneration of humankind and abolish all frontiers.' Even in Britain, where the political culture of labour was generally anything but revolutionary, the prestige of the March (or February) Revolution gave a fillip to the yearning for peace. An extraordinary meeting of socialist opposition groups, held in Leeds in June 1917, called for the establishment of 'Councils of Workers and Soldiers' throughout the country.



*International Socialism* writes with a hint of pride of the many workers strikes organized in France, Germany, Austria, and Italy, and how the war helped make them possible:


http://isj.org.uk/the-mass-strike-in-the-first-world-war/
	The immediate response to the war in Germany was a lull in strike action. In 1915 there were just 141 strikes involving 13,000 participants. The following year the number of strikes increased by 70 percent with the number of strikers up tenfold. Early in 1916 there had been food riots mainly by women and young people. The Berlin police reported that, “the number of housewives who are openly expressing their discontent is growing all the time”. On May Day the revolutionary left organised anti-war protests in Dresden, Jena, Hanau and Berlin, where 10,000 demonstrated. The latter led to the arrest of anti-war revolutionary Karl Liebknecht, who was sentenced to two and a half years in prison. This precipitated an overtly political strike for his release by 55,000 engineers, called by Berlin shop stewards.


The German Communist Emil Barth wrote that the purposes of these movements were to foment revolutions:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Emil_Barth
	Although he became somewhat more moderate by the end of 1918, Barth had always been the Council's most radical member, calling on workers, for instance, not to 'debase the revolution to a movement for wages,' since that would merely ameliorate conditions, making fundamental change less likely (in an article in Die Rote Fahne, 28 November 1918).


He and other leading socialists showed a pernicious kind of thinking that basically placed "the revolution" in importance above all else, including the well-being of the people in countries they claimed they were liberating. In this kind of thinking, prolonging or even creating poverty and war is permissible so long as it galvanizes people for the revolution.


...


The Russian general Denikin wrote of Bolshevik propaganda targeting the Russian army in his memoirs (the whole book is a good read):


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	The Russian turmoil; memoirs: military, social, and political
	by Denikin, Anton Ivanovich

	...I have more grounds and more right to speak of the Army and in the name of the Army than all those strangers of the Socialist Camp, who, in their haughty self-conceit, as soon as they touched the Army, began breaking down its foundations, judging its leaders and fighters and diagnosing its serious disease, who even now, after grievous experiments and experiences, have not given up the hope of transforming this mighty and terrible weapon of national self-preservation into a means for satisfying party and social appetites. For me, the Army is not only an historical, social, national phenomenon, but nearly the whole of my life, in which lie many memories, precious and not to be forgotten, in which all is bound up and interlaced into one general mass of swiftly passing days of sadness and of joy, in which there are hundreds of cherished graves, of buried dreams and unextinguishable faith.

	...Then came a torrent of newspapers, appeals, resolutions, orders, from some unknown authority, and with them a whole series of new ideas, which the soldier masses were unable to digest and assimilate. New people appeared, with a new speech, so fascinating and promising, liberating the soldiers from obedience and inspiring hope that they would be saved from deadly danger immediately. When one Regimental Commander naively inquired whether these people might not be tried by Field Court-Martial and shot, his telegram, after passing through all official stages, called forth the reply from Petrograd that these people were inviolable, and had been sent by the Soviet to the troops for the very purpose of explaining to them the true meaning of current events. 

	When such leaders of the Revolutionary Democracy, as have not yet lost their feeling of responsibility for crucified Russia, now say that the movement, caused by the deep class differences between the officers and the soldiers and by " the enslavement " of the latter, was of an elemental nature, which they could not resist, this is deeply untrue. 

	All the fundamental slogans, all the programmes, tactics, instructions and text-books, forming the foundation of the "democratisation" of the Army, had been drawn up by the military sections of the secret Socialist parties long before the War, outside of "elemental" pressure, on the grounds of clear, cold calculation, as a product of "Socialist reasoning and conscience." 

	True, the officers strove to persuade the men not to believe the "new words" and to do their duty. But from the very beginning the Soviets had declared the officers to be foes of the Revolution; in many towns they had been subjected to cruel torture and death, and this with impunity. Evidently not without some reason, when even the "Bourgeois" Duma issued such a strange and unexpected "announcement" as the following: "This first day of March, rumours were spread among the soldiers of the garrison of Petrograd to the effect that the officers in the regiments were disarming the soldiers. These rumours were investigated and found to be false. As President of the Military Commission of the Provisional Committee of the State Duma, I declare that the most decided measures will be taken to prevent such action on the part of the officers, up to the shooting of those guilty of it. Signed, Colonel Engelhardt." 

	Next came Order No. I., the Declaration and so forth.


	...Paragraph 6 stipulates that all literature should be delivered to the addressees, and the Army was flooded with criminal Bolshevik and Defeatist literature. The stuff upon which our Army was fed — and apparently at the expense of Government funds and of the people's treasure — can be gauged from the report of the Moscow Military Bureau, which alone supplied to the Front the following publications: 

		From March 24th to May 1st —
			7,972 copies of the Pravda
			2,000  "    "   Soldiers' Pravda
			30,375 "    "   Social Democrat

		From May 1st to June 11th —
			61,522 copies of the Soldiers' Pravda
			32,711   "    "  Social Democrat
			6,999 11 "    "  Pravda

	and so on. The same kind of literature was sent to the villages by the soldiers.


Some actions of the Kerensky government (like Order No. I which "democratized" the army) also contributed to demoralizing the Russian army, introducing them to Bolshevist ideas, and fomenting mutiny. Similar things can be found in other countries, like the French army mutinies of 1917:


http://www.jstor.org/stable/24436670?seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents
	...Although it may have been superficial, the influence of the Russian revolution on the mutineers was unmistakable. Notable in this connection, and perhaps the best known incident of the mutinies, is the revolt of the Russian brigades. Three Russian brigades had arrived in France early in 1916 for service on the French front. They were already infected by the revolutionary propaganda that was rife in the Czar's army. After the March revolution they had formed soviets and demanded to vote on their participation in the April 16 offensive. They had voted overwhelmingly to fight, and according to Painlevé, who was in a position to know, they conducted themselves gallantly before Brimont. Painlevé suggests it was the First Russian Brigade that sowed the seeds of the mutinies. The date of their first act of insubordination is not clear, although it would appear to have been around the middle of May.18 By June they had been transferred to an isolation camp at Courtine near Limoges. Here on June 9 the soldiers' council of the First Regiment published a manifesto that ranks as the most revealing document of the period of the mutinies:

		Since our arrival in France a year and a half ago, the rumor has been current that we had been sold for munitions. These rumors have multiplied more and more; in short they consider the Russian soldier not as a man but as a thing.

	Terrail reports that during the next three days a loyal Russian brigade fired 500 rounds of artillery into the camp. After eight men were killed and twenty-eight wounded, the rest submitted to discipline. Churchill repeats this statement, which would appear to be the origin of the many stories of the bombardment of mutineers that were circulated after the event. On the other hand, Major General Sir Edward Spears has informed the writers that there was no shelling of mutinous troops, although he agrees that the Russians bear much responsibility for inciting the revolts.

	...	The most damming evidence against the Minister of the Interior, viewed in historical perspective, is Nivelle's letter of February 28, already cited, in which the general asked Minister of War Lyautey to intervene with Malvy to take action against the disseminators of pacifist and defeatist propaganda, who were undermining the morale of the army. He did not say, as Mangin tried to imply before the letter became public, that the police under Malvy were actually protecting the propagandists, but the general did make it clear that he had received no co-operation from the Ministry of the Interior on what he regarded as a critical matter.

	...the first Russian revolution, was clearly in the minds of many French soldiers during the uprisings. The socialist slogans that were shouted, the demands that the government issue passports to the Stockholm peace convention, and the general agreement on the pernicious example of the Russian brigades make clear the importance of foreign socialist influence.


There are accounts that the French mutinies were fomented by socialists and foreign subversion, but there is a historical debate about this. The article cited (http://www.jstor.org/stable/24436670?seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents
) talks about this historical debate and identifies some of the people who believed foreign subversion was the cause and their reasons, but some parts of the article unfortunately come off as too biased.

Apparently, the French mutinies were helped by members of the French government, particularly Minister of the Interior Malvy, who went on trial for treason:


https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/Malvy
	At the outbreak of war Malvy resisted calls for the round-up of so-called subversives unionists, pacifists and other 'undesirables' whose names were listed in the Carnet B. He became involved in subsidising newspapers and came under intense criticism when it was learned that the Bonnet Rouge (one of the papers supported by Malvy) had been receiving German money to spread pacifist propaganda.

	When the paper's administrator, Duval, was arrested with a cheque on his person from a German banker, Clemenceau accused Malvy during a secret session of the Senate in July 1917 of 'betraying the interests of France'. When the paper's director was also arrested as a result of the subsequent investigation (which revealed the sale of the paper to a shadowy intermediary, Bolo Pacha), the paper was closed and its director died in prison.

	Added to the civilian unrest of 1917 and the French Army mutinies, the discovery of French military documents in the Bonnet Rouge's offices meant the end for Malvy. 

	As Minister of the Interior, he was blamed for not suppressing defeatist and pacifist agitators and publications with sufficient energy and he was forced to resign on 31 August 1917. In October he was charged with treason and tried by a special commission of the Senate the following year. Although acquitted of treason, he was found guilty of culpable negligence in the performance of his duties and banished for five years. His former directeur du cabinet was imprisoned, however, and Bolo and Duval received death sentences.

	Despite this close association with men found guilty of serious crimes, he returned to the Chamber of Deputies after the war and again became Minister of the Interior, briefly, in 1926. 


This article goes into detail about the trial of Malvy and other convicted or suspect traitors in France:

https://books.google.com/books?id=tnsxAQAAMAAJ&pg=PA267&lpg=PA267


The mutinies did not lead to any revolutions, although by some accounts they could have:


http://journals.sagepub.com/doi/abs/10.1177/096834459500200203?journalCode=wiha
	...they involved a collective and categorical refusal of orders to take up positions in the front lines. Second, for the most part, the demonstrations concluded with soldiers leaving for other units to encourage further resistance. Third, soldier's stated demands--sometimes including peace though revolution if necessary--went well beyond boundaries of expression normally conceded even to citizen-soldiers.


http://isj.org.uk/the-mass-strike-in-the-first-world-war/
	International Socialism

	The momentum of mass strikes

	France, a struggle thwarted

	...In the spring of 1917 women seamstresses struck for 11 days winning a half day off on Saturdays. This strike became known to troops taking part in the huge mutiny at Chemin des Dames, with one machine gunner writing home, “We are doing like the Midinettes”, referring to the women textile workers.60 May Day rallies cheered the Russian Revolution. 


*International Socialism*, at least, sees the French mutinies and associated strikes as "a struggle thwarted"--activities that could have led to a socialist French revolution but didn't.


Mutiny in Germany, however, *did* lead to a socialist revolution. As with the Russian and French armies, Bolshevik agitation hit the German army too:


https://translate.google.com/translate?hl=en&sl=de&u=http://www.spiegel.de/spiegel/spiegelspecialgeschichte/d-54841257.html&prev=search
	...slowly it dawned on the German strategists that in the end they would be the losers of the purposive alliance between Lenin and the Hohenzollern empire.

	In the end, Wilhelm's generals did not even dare to relocate soldiers from the Ukraine or the Baltic to the Western Front because the men were meanwhile regarded as unreliable: they sympathized with Lenin's revolution. A request from the Bolsheviks to have 20,000 machine guns, 200,000 rifles, and 500 million cartridges was rejected by the Supreme Command, saying that there was a danger that the weapons "might later be used against us."

	For Lenin calculated as coolly as the Foreign Office, and while he cooperated with the Empire in Moscow during the summer, he spared neither money nor expense to support those comrades in the Reich who were aiming for a German Soviet republic.

	The Germans should have been warned - it was the same policy of revolution that they had supported in the years before when it was against the Czar. 



This memoir shows the attitude of some German soldiers was not so different from the Russian soldier "infected" (as Denikin puts it) with Bolshevik propaganda:


https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/IX_SOLDIERS_SHOOTING_THEIR_OWN_OFFICERS
	IT was dark already, and we halted once more. The ground around us was strewn with dead. In the middle of the road were some French batteries and munition wagons, with the horses still attached; but horses and men were dead. After a ten minutes' rest we started again. Marching more quickly, we now approached a mall wood in which dismounted cavalry and infantry were waging a desperate hand-to-hand struggle with the enemy. So as to astonish the latter we had to rush in with a mighty yell. Under cover of darkness we had succeeded in getting to the enemy's rear. Taken by surprise by the unexpected attack and our war whoop, most of the Frenchmen lifted their hands and begged for quarter, which was, however, not granted by the infuriated cavalrymen and infantry. When, on our side, now and then the murdering of defenseless men seemed to slacken it was encouraged again by the loud commands of the officers. "No quarter!" "Cut them all down!" Such were the orders of those estimable gentlemen, the officers.

	...However, not all the soldiers approved of that senseless, that criminal murdering. Some of the "gentlemen" who had ordered us to massacre our French comrades were killed "by mistake" in the darkness of the night, by their own people, of course. Such "mistakes" repeat themselves almost daily, and if I keep silence with regard to many such mistakes which I could relate, giving the exact name and place, the reader will know why. 

	During that night it was a captain and first lieutenant who met his fate. An infantryman who was serving his second year stabbed the captain through the stomach with his bayonet, and almost at the same time the first lieutenant got a stab in the back. Both men were dead in a few minutes. Those that did the deed showed not the slightest sign of repentance, and not one of us felt inclined to reproach them; on the contrary, every one knew that despicable, brutal murderers had met their doom.


(Although it's possible the memoir itself is Bolsehvik propaganda--it's a little suspicious that the author chose to remain anonymous, and some of the passages advocating German soldiers to kill their officers to protect "French comrades" are a little much.)

Whether or not the memoir is real, by many accounts Bolshevik propaganda had a major effect on the German army:


http://socialistreview.org.uk/393/revolution-trenches
	Given the enormity of the casualties, the war might have been seen by most soldiers as an inescapable juggernaut of death. But as the trenches became almost a fixed feature of the war, soldiers on all sides began to choose to face it with a different attitude — to live and to avoid killing in order not to be killed. They began the practice that became known as “Live and let live”. The best known examples were those at the Christmas truce in 1914, but in-depth studies have shown and many memoirs have recorded that troops on both sides came to more and more frequent “‘live and let live” arrangements. The generals called it fraternisation and forbade it. Russian revolutionary leader Vladimir Lenin wrote that it was the instinctive response of oppressed people, tired, exhausted and losing confidence in capitalist promises. These arrangements were not motivated by clear-cut political ideas. The will to survive and to respect the enemy soldiers’ wish to do the same replaced ruling class exhortations to “Kill the Hun” or “Destroy the English”.

	It was the beginning of a gradual change of attitude among the frontline soldiers, that in the end came to predominate. It finally brought the war to an end in waves of draft dodging, desertions and voluntary surrenders, initially by the Russians, French and Italians in 1917, and from March to October 1918, by the Germans, Bulgarians and Austria-Hungarians. Germany’s defeat was presented by military historians as a hard fought struggle to the bitter end. In reality voluntary surrenders, desertions and mutinies foiled the generals’ plans. The revolutions that followed this mass disobedience brought down three European empires and the Ottoman Empire of the Turks. The “endemic live and let live” truces started the process of troops abandoning the war.

	...Lenin argued that live and let live and draft dodging should not simply continue as the only possible way for individual soldiers to survive through to the peace, but that revolutionaries should set themselves the task of turning fraternisation and the will to survive into politically conscious movements to transfer power into the hands of the revolutionary proletariat.

	...	In April 1917 when the Americans joined the war almost half the French army overstayed home leave, deserted or mutinied, often singing the Internationale in protest at the war’s continuation. Subsequently general Petain kept the mutineers out of any major battles for almost a year and regained their loyalty by meeting many of their demands for longer leave and better food. With the help of the French Social Democrats he was able to deflect the drive to revolution.

	The same was not the case when the German soldiers and sailors decided to desert en masse and to surrender without a fight. No German general succeeded in driving them back into the trenches. A minority of suicidal machine gunners did not quit their posts and British troops died by the thousand after being ordered to walk in open ranks to attack their strong points.

	...Subsequent attacks by the Germans failed due to the drastically depleted ranks of their divisions. Draft dodging in Germany had become so common in 1917 that enrolment fell from 1.4 million to 0.6 million, a figure that reduced reserves for all the German armies and the size of its divisions at the front to the point where offensive battles were no longer possible. This marked the end of Ludendorff’s war plans. Many of the German relief divisions, having served in Russia in the run up to the Brest-Litovsk peace treaty, when fraternisation with the Russians had become common, sounded like Bolsheviks according to one top commander. Ten percent of the replacements jumped off the trains as they were transferred to the Western Front. Others had been sent to the front as punishment for going on strike in the munition factories. “Stay at home,” they shouted to the men they were replacing. The “hidden army strike” removed over a million troops from Germany’s field armies sent to defend its borders after the failure of the spring offensive.

	...In the final months of the war one in every two in the reserves failed to report for duty. Ludendorff himself became a deserter in late October and fled to Sweden. Some army generals and those commanding the navy and the air force called for national unity in one last ditch battle. They even considered bombing the trains that the deserters-turned-mutineers had commandeered to take them home. The Kaiser, Emperor Wilhelm II, supported the generals’ call for a desperate last stand. He and those preparing to attack their own workers and soldiers were over-ruled by the lower ranks of generals for fear of provoking a civil war in Germany. Without the support of his generals, the Kaiser abandoned his post.

	In November 1918 sailors at Kiel naval port joined the mutiny and took over the town and the German Revolution had begun. The working class, in and out of uniform, were quitting the war and the war leaders were forced to call for an armistice. It was a year after mass desertions had begun and the Russian Revolution had brought the war in Eastern Europe to an end. Allied generals had not planned to end the war until July 1919, by which time a fully mobilised US army would be ready for a final onslaught. 






https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Revolutions_of_1917%E2%80%931923


http://spartacus-educational.com/GERrevolution.htm

http://spartacus-educational.com/GERspartacus.htm

https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Revolutionary_Stewards



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Biennio_Rosso


http://socialistreview.org.uk/393/revolution-trenches


socialists talk about how army revolts helped the revolution




socialists talk about how anti-war sentiment helped with a lot of strikes


Hungarian, Bavarian, Ukraine soviet republics




https://wwi.lib.byu.edu/index.php/IX_SOLDIERS_SHOOTING_THEIR_OWN_OFFICERS
	IT was dark already, and we halted once more. The ground around us was strewn with dead. In the middle of the road were some French batteries and munition wagons, with the horses still attached; but horses and men were dead. After a ten minutes' rest we started again. Marching more quickly, we now approached a mall wood in which dismounted cavalry and infantry were waging a desperate hand-to-hand struggle with the enemy. So as to astonish the latter we had to rush in with a mighty yell. Under cover of darkness we had succeeded in getting to the enemy's rear. Taken by surprise by the unexpected attack and our war whoop, most of the Frenchmen lifted their hands and begged for quarter, which was, however, not granted by the infuriated cavalrymen and infantry. When, on our side, now and then the murdering of defenseless men seemed to slacken it was encouraged again by the loud commands of the officers. "No quarter!" "Cut them all down!" Such were the orders of those estimable gentlemen, the officers.


on being forced to kill someone you don't want to (was this soldier conscripted?)


	...However, not all the soldiers approved of that senseless, that criminal murdering. Some of the "gentlemen" who had ordered us to massacre our French comrades were killed "by mistake" in the darkness of the night, by their own people, of course. Such "mistakes" repeat themselves almost daily, and if I keep silence with regard to many such mistakes which I could relate, giving the exact name and place, the reader will know why. 


"French comrades"? seems off


	During that night it was a captain and first lieutenant who met his fate. An infantryman who was serving his second year stabbed the captain through the stomach with his bayonet, and almost at the same time the first lieutenant got a stab in the back. Both men were dead in a few minutes. Those that did the deed showed not the slightest sign of repentance, and not one of us felt inclined to reproach them; on the contrary, every one knew that despicable, brutal murderers had met their doom.







https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1915/jul/26.htm
	V. I.   Lenin
	The Defeat of One’s Own Government in the Imperialist War

	To desire Russia’s defeat, Trotsky writes, is “an uncalled-for and absolutely unjustifiable concession to the political methodology of social-patriotism, which would replace the revolutionary struggle against the war and the conditions causing it, with an orientation—highly arbitrary in the present conditions—towards the lesser evil” (Nashe Slovo No. 105). 

	...The phrase-bandying Trotsky has completely lost his bearings on a simple issue. It seems to him that to desire Russia’s defeat means desiring the victory of Germany.

	...A revolution in wartime means civil war; the conversion of a war between governments into a civil war is, on the one hand, facilitated by military reverses ("defeats") of governments; on the other hand, one cannot actually strive for such a conversion without thereby facilitating defeat.




https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1918/aug/28.htm
	Vladimir Lenin

	...The Russian revolution has shown that the war is inevitably leading to the disintegration of capitalist society in general, that it is being converted into a war of the working people against the exploiters. Therein lies the significance of the Russian revolution.



https://www.marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1918/jun/29b.htm
	V. I. Lenin
	Prophetic Words

	“. . . Crowns will roll by dozens. . . .” Several crowns have already fallen. And one of them is worth dozens of others—the crown of the autocrat of all the Russias, Nicholas Romanov.

	...“. . . Hopeless confusion of our artificial machinery in trade, industry and credit. . . .” At the end of the fourth year of war this has been fully borne out in the case of one of the biggest and most backward of the states drawn into the war by the capitalists—Russia. But do not the growing starvation in Gerrnany and Austria, the shortage of clothing and raw material and the wearing out of the means of production show that a similar state of affairs is very rapidly overtaking other countries as well? 

	...What stupidity, what spinelessness—not to say mercenary service to the bourgeoisie—is displayed by those who, like our Novaya Zhizn group, Mensheviks, Right Socialist-Revolutionaries, etc., while continuing to call themselves “socialists”, maliciously point to the manifestation of this “hopeless confusion” and lay the blame for everything on the revolutionary proletariat, the Soviet power, the “utopia” of the transition to socialism.

	...Travail may be light or severe. Marx and Engels, the founders of scientific socialism, always said that the transition from capitalism to socialism would be inevitably accompanied by prolonged birth pangs.

	...Clearly realising this, Engels speaks with great caution of socialism being brought to birth by a capitalist socicty which is perishing in a world war. “Only one result [of a world war],” he says, “is absolutely certain: general exhaustion and the establishment of the conditions for the ultimate victory of the working class.” 

	...“. . . At the end of the tragedy you (the capitalists and landowners, the kings and statesmen of the bourgeoisie) will be ruined and the victory of the proletariat will either be already achieved or at any rate inevitable.” 






https://www.marxists.org/archive/luxemburg/1915/xx/theses.htm
	World peace cannot be assured by projects utopian or, at bottom, reactionary, such as tribunals of arbitration by capitalist diplomatists, diplomatic “disarmament” conventions, “the freedom of the seas,” abolition of the right of maritime arrest, “the United States of Europe,” a “customs union for central Europe,” buffer states, and other illusions. Imperialism, militarism and war can never be abolished nor attenuated so long as the capitalist class exercises, uncontested, its class hegemony. The sole means of successful resistance, and the only guarantee of the peace of the world, is the capacity for action and the revolutionary will of the international proletariat to hurl its full weight into the balance



https://www.marxists.org/archive/luxemburg/1917/04/oldmole.htm
	The grudging respect of the German and Austro-Hungarian governments for the ‘cadgers and conspirators’ and the nervous tension with which our ruling classes receive every utterance by Cheidze and by the workers’ and soldiers’ soviet concerning the question of war and peace are now a tangible confirmation of the fact which only yesterday met the uncomprehending opposition of the socialists from the A.G. This was the fact that the way out of the blind alley of the world war led not through diplomatic ‘agreements’ and Wilsonian messages, but solely and exclusively through the revolutionary action of the proletariat. The victors at Tannenberg and Warsaw now tremblingly await their own ‘liberation’ from the choking noose of war by the Russian proletariat, by the ‘mob in the street’!

	Of course even with the greatest heroism the proletariat of one single country cannot loosen this noose. The Russian Revolution is growing of its own accord into an international problem. For the peace efforts of the Russian workers bring them into acute conflict not only with their own bourgeoisie, but also with the English, French and Italian bourgeoisie. The rumblings of the bourgeois press in all the Entente countries – The Times, Matin, Corriere della Sera, etc. – show that the capitalists of the West, these stout-hearted champions of ‘democracy’ and of the rights of the ‘small nations’, are watching, with gnashing teeth and hourly mounting rage, the advances made by the proletarian revolution that has checked the glorious era of the undivided rule of imperialism in Europe.











Lenin support for German revolution, propagandizing German army:






http://www.jstor.org/stable/24436670?seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents


biased article on French army mutinees


&nbsp;





https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	Perhaps, however, it might have been possible to combat all this verbal ocean of lies and hypocrisy which flowed from Petrograd and from the local Soviets and was echoed by the local demagogues had it not been for a circumstance which paralysed all the efforts of the Commanders, viz., the animal feeling of self- preservation which had flooded the whole mass of the soldiers. This feeling had always existed. But it had been kept under and restrained by examples of duty fulfilled, by flashes of national self-consciousness, by shame, fear and pressure. When all these elements had disappeared, when for the soothing of a drowsy conscience there was a whole arsenal of new conceptions, which justified the care for one's own hide and furnished it with an ideal basis, then the Army could exist no longer. This feeling upset all the efforts of the Commanders, all moral principles and the whole regiment of the Army. 





Denekin counts soviet propaganda funded by government sent to soldiers:


https://archive.org/stream/russianturmoilme00deniuoft/russianturmoilme00deniuoft_djvu.txt
	...Paragraph 6 stipulates that all literature should be delivered to the addressees, and the Army was flooded with criminal Bolshevik and Defeatist literature. The stuff upon which our Army was fed — and apparently at the expense of Government funds and of the people's treasure — can be gauged from the report of the Moscow Military Bureau, which alone supplied to the Front the following publications: 

		From March 24th to May 1st —
			7,972 copies of the Pravda
			2,000  "    "   Soldiers' Pravda
			30,375 "    "   Social Democrat

		From May 1st to June 11th —
			61,522 copies of the Soldiers' Pravda
			32,711   "    "  Social Democrat
			6,999 11 "    "  Pravda

	and so on. The same kind of literature was sent to the villages by the soldiers.



https://www.iww.org/sv/history/resolutions/Convention_war_1916
	Anti-war resolution passed by the 1916 convention of the Industrial Workers of the World:

	...With the European war for conquest and exploitation raging and destroying our lives, class consciousness and the unity of the workers, and the ever-growing agitation for military preparedness clouding the main issues and delaying the realization of our ultimate aim with patriotic and therefore capitalistic aspirations, we openly declare ourselves the determined opponents of all nationalistic sectionalism, or patriotism, and the militarism preached and supported by our one enemy, the capitalist class.




...


war unpopular in most countries

http://alphahistory.com/worldwar1/russian-revolution/


fueled starvation, revolution in Russia, socialist uprisings, unrest in America (IWW? were terrorist attacks related to WW1), spartacists, Reichstag peace resolution in Germany

Rosa Luxemberg helped found spartacus league which became German communist party, helped to foment unrest during war but also came off as wanting war


conscription in British empire lead to resentment of British government. Arrests and police raids of anti-conscriptionists in Austrailia, rioting in Quebec city, "Conscription Crisis" in Ireland


mutinies of 1917 in France were serious (like half of Western front?), wikipedia says socialist propaganda was involved, mutinees triggered by optimism about neville offensive giving way to disaster, discontent with war

German sailors mutinees in Kiel involving "workers councils" and "sailors councils"

in u.s., "aliens" from Russia fomented sabotage to "keep the soldier at home:"


	The Voix du Peuple: "The first thing to do before going out on strike is to cripple all the machinery. * * * Are bakery workers planning to go on strike? Let them pour in the ovens a few pints of petroleum or any other greasy or pungent matter. After that soldiers or scabs may come and bake bread. The smell will not come out of the tiles for three months. Is a strike in sight in steel mills? Pour sand or emery into the oil cups."

	...Sabotage: It's History, Philosophy, and Function, by Walker C. Smith: "Sabotage is a direct application of the idea that property has no rights that its creators are bound to respect. * * * The question is not, Is Sabotage Immoral? but, Does Sabotage get the goods? * * * A bar of soap in the boiler would keep the soldiers at home or else force them to march to the strike. ...Sabotage is discredited by those who believe in property rights. It is the weapon of those who no longer reverence the thing that fetters them. Its advocacy and use helps to destroy the 'property illusion.' The parasites who have property, oppose sabotage, while the producers who have poverty, are commencing to yield that potent weapon."




in most countries, see socialists taken control of anti-war effort from the start


war naturally conducive to discord between citizens and government--war started by government leaders, but citizens suffer, most people simply don't like war. WWI in particular was widely believed to have been started for imperialistic aims (although right-wing argues war for defense)


can see examples of socialist using anti-war sentiment to further their cause in their propaganda


Lenin very into propaganda, espionage

war gave Germans reason to propagandize Russian army, helping Bolsheviks spread their ideas without them having to pay for it and being less likely to be blamed for it


&nbsp;


https://www.jstor.org/stable/2538811



after failure of stockholm conference, socialists, progressives, and centrist in Germany joined forces to pass a "peace resolution" in the Reichstag

German officials carry much of the blame

after war, question of war guilt was on everyones mind, important as shown by Versailles treaty


Foreign ministry withheld official documents that would show their war guilt

"the combersome nature of the investigative process was due, in part, to the Foreign ministry's desire to keep documents tied up in committee and thus from public scrutiny for an indefinite period."

		...Unsurprisingly, the patriotic self-censors in the Foreign Ministry barred publication of even a single volume of the findings of the second subcommittee for frear of adverse reaction both overseas and among the German clergy; further, they assured that even the upublished material would not see the light of day by indiscriminately stamping "secret" on 28 of the 37 folders of documents.


hounded reasearchers who disagreed with their propaganda, smear them and try to censor them (Lutz and Kantorowicz). Kantorowicz book later burned by Hitler

	...	The most controversial investigation, of course, was that the first subcommittee, charged with assessing Germany's role in the July crisis. There, after all, was the heart of Article 231 of the Versailles treaty The Foreign Ministry was acutely sensitive to possible Allied charges that this committee was stacked with its minions, and hence the Wilhelmstrasse encouraged the Reichstag to engage "nuetral" experts. The choice fell upon the Munic publicist Hermann Lutz and the Freiburg jurist Hermann Kantorowicz. Despite the fact that Lutz was closely associated with the revisionist campaign conducted by the Foreign Ministry, his affidavit, completed in 1924, proved embarrassingly balanced. Lutz placed Serbia and Russia t the top of the list of those responsible for the war, closely followed by Austria-Hungary, and then by the rest of the parties involved. Lutz's evaluation of the Habsburg policy of brinkmanship in July 1914 at once drew the ire of fellow investigators Max von Montgelas and Richard von Delbruck, both itimately involved with the Foreign Ministry's revisionist endeavors. Indeed, the Wilhelmstrasse "encouraged" Lutz to "revise" his affidavit; in its second form, the Gutachten placed Vienna in a more favorable light. Nevertheless, the Foreign Ministry again used its veto power to delay publication of Lutz's affidavit for half a decade (until 1930).


memiors of important actors in war were also withheld, and some memiors were ghost-written by editors


Foreign Ministry launched massive propaganda campaign, buying of journalists, historians, forming front organizations to spread propaganda and targeting youth and students


this propaganda contributed to "war guilt lie," belief that Germany was ganged-up on by other countries, which led directly to Nazism


Herwig also identified a propaganda campaign among historians that persisted after the first and second world wars

Albertini ignored until Fischer "rediscovered" him, then Fischer attacked, Albertini still ignored


The Foreign Ministry's campaign made it harder to debate about the Versailles treaty and German war guilt. They linked the war guilt issue very early on to the campaign to revise Versailles, setting up a political fight around Versailles.

It seems like all they had to do was show that their politicians acted against the will and best interests of the public and turn them over. The main argument against the Versailles treaty, as far as I can tell, is that the German people didn't ask for the war and didn't want the war--their politicians did. While they shcemed to keep the war going, Germans were protesting and got the Reichstag to call for a general peace. The argument is that you shouldn't punish a whole country of people for the actions of a few politicians who were acting against them in the first place.

The Foreign Ministry's propaganda actually makes it harder to argue this, even if its still true: by creating support for the Foreign Ministry among the public and getting them to believe that Germany--critically the government, including the Foreign Ministry--was innocent, they made it so the public looks like they supported the actors in Germany who started the war and their actions, as if the public were complicit.

If they had actually been able to get out the truth about the origins of the war and had better representation at Versailles, they might have been able to argue that. But I guess the Foreign Ministry had other ideas.


		...In retrospect, the revisionist campaign conducted by men such as Bulow, Draeger, Freytag, Montgelas, Shucking, and Thimme, amont others, retarded critical appraisal of the origins of the war until the 1960s. A certain orthodoxy on the war-guilt issue developed; Europe, in the immortal words of David Lloyd Geroge, had simply "slid" into the war in 1914 with roughly equal amounts of ignorance and naivete. It simply cannot be stressed enough that by linking the war guilt issue very early on to the campaign to "revise" the Versailles treaty, the patriotic censors virtually precluded sober and rational investigation into the matter.




...

		...from June 1919 through the Third Reich, key elements of the German bureaucracy mounted a massive and successful campaign of disinformation that purveyed false propaganda through a wide range of channels. These included the War Guilt Section (Kriegsschuldreferat) of the Foreign Ministry, which disseminated its official stance on war guilt most notably through two agencies which it recruited to this end--the Working Committee of German Associations (Arbeitsausschsuss Duetscher Verbande) annd the Center for the Study of the Causes of the War (Zetralstell zue ERforschung der Kiregsculdfrage)--as well as a parliamentary Committee of Enquiery (Untersuchungsausschuss). Writers were also engaged either directly or indirectly by the Foreign Ministry to propagate its views, to organize translations of foreign studies sympathetic to the German cause, and to channel the Whilhelmstrasse's official line to German schools and diplomatic missions via newspapers and radio.

		...the Foreign Ministry eventually decided to establish several independent bureaus under the umbrella of its Kreigshuldreferat. These eventually functioned on both an overt and a covert level; at the public level, they disseminated the official view on the origins of the war, while behind the scenes they sought to promote those who followed the official line and to silence--indeed, eventually to hound out of office--those who put forth independent and/or unacceptable interpretations.



		...And while much of the nation gradually had gotten over the initial shock of the harsh terms handed down at Versailles, the Allied demand in January 1921 for reparations in the amount of 226 billion Mark, with annual payments over the next 42 years, once again came to the aid of the Foreign Ministry's "revisionist" endeavors.



		...Nor is it possible to gain any accurate insight into the number of independent scholars and journalists engaged by the Wilhelmstrasse in a similar function. While Geiss speaks of a small army of such publicists, Heinemann tends toward a much smaller number. In the main, these writers were paid modest honorariums of perhaps several hundred Mark in order to pen three of four articles per month for leading newspapers, which, in turn, passed them on to the provincial press. Most prominent among this group were the Munich journalist Hermann Lutz and the army's specialist on Belgium, Colonel Schwrtfeger; the latter was also paid by the Foreign Ministry to compile an eight-party guide to Die Grosse Politik for the nonprofessional reader One of the few foreign writers directly subsidized by the Wilhelmstrasse appears to have been Milos Boghitschewitsch, the former Serbian charge d'affaires to Germany, who wrote articles for the Foreign Office during the 1920s and who apparently was paid in that most rare of commodities at Berlin, gold.

		...It is striking that not a single eminent historian of the 1920s bothered to undertake serious research and publication on the origins of the war. I contrast to the post-1945 period, they left the debate by default in the hands of the Foreign Ministry and its minions.

		...It is estimated, for example, that in 1925 alone, the Working Committee conducted 1,456 such undertakings in behalf of the reviionist campaign. Moreover, it effectively penetrated the daily press, maintaining contacts to no less than 1,500 newspapers through the 35 major news agencies in Berlin.



		...It is impossible to pinpoint the effect of this propaganda, either in Germany or overseas. Needless to say, the cumulative effect of ten years of continuous activity in this area must have taken its toll. Several German states, such as Baden Bavaria, Sachen-Anhalt, Wurttemberg, and Waldeck, openly adopt ADV materials for classroom instruction. ...The DV, for its part, routinely organized talks at high schools and seminars at universities on the issue of the "war-guilt lie," and this mobilization especially of the youth could only have paved the way for their favorable reception of Adolf Hitler's "revisionist ideas."



		...In short, the high bureaucracy was not interested in personnel purges in 1919. Nor were the dominant Social Democrats. In fact, the SPD never demanded that the senior statesmen and diplomats of the empire be held accountable. The resulting irony was that the Republic's Committee of Enquiry, for example, relied for many of its "expert" affidavits upon the very men who had been in positions of power and responsibility in July 1914, men such as Gottleib von Jagow and Johanes Kreig. By failing to clean house in 1919, by failing to confront the matter of Germany's role in the origins of the First World War brutally and honestly, and, above all, by failing to chase the patriotic censors from their temples of influence, the first leaders of the Weimar Republic did their country a great disservice.

		...Conversely, the patriotic censors with their campaign of obfuscation, delay, preemptive historiography, and mass propaganda made quite certain that the issue would never be allowed to die, as Hans Freytag had foreseen as early as 1919. Max Weber, despite his signature on the "professors' memorandum" of May 1919, in time came to lament this turn of events. "Every document that comes to light after decades," he sadly noted, "revives the undignified squabbling, the hatred and anger, instead of at least *decently* burying the war and its end."

		...Yet the war-guilt game was dangerous because, as Karl Kautsky had put it in 1919, it was "not only a scholarly question for historians," but "an eminently practical question for politicians." For the authors of the war, the answer to the question of who was responsible amounted to a "death sentence" as they surely would be "cast among the politically dead. . . stripped of all power."



		An additional domestic benefit was that the vigorous pursuance of "revisionism" on the part of the Wilhelmstrasse might take some of the thunder out of the charges of "defeatism" and "softness" constantly leveled against the Republic by its right-wing detractors over the issue of "fulfillment" of the Versailles treaty, and thereby benefit Sresemann's flexible and moderate revisionist diplomacy.

		Unfortunately, the events of 1932-33 were to show that this national consensus was tenuous at best; the seemingly diametrically opposed poles of extreme nationalism and national inferiority (engendered by the war-guilt charge) were to be brutally but effectively exploited by the extreme right, the real "winners" of the revisionist campaign. In short, by delaying an open and honest discussion on the origins of the First World War for four decades, the self-censors did their party to bring about a political climate receptive to the radical "revisionist" ideas of Adolf Hitler and his supporters.

		At the risk of belaboring the obvious, I will conclude this overview of how Clio was deceived in Germany by suggesting that the moral and institutional lessons to be learned have not lost any of their crispness and validity over the decades. It servers no national interest to obfuscate and derail intellectual inquiry. Miscalculated risks are rarely glossed over simply by selectively editing pertinent documents and by having paid publicists tout the desired line through government-controlled presses and publishers. "PPreemptive historiography" may succeed in the short run; over time, it is likely to be uncovered as the sham that it is. In the final analysis, it was nothing short of a tragedy that, in the words of Hermann Hesse, "90 or 100 prominent men" conspired in the supposed interests of the state "to deceive the people on this vital question of national interest." Nor was Hesse in doubt as to the effectiveness of the campaign of "patriotic self-censorship," informing Thomas Mann in 1931 of his opinion that "of 1,000 Germans, even today 999 still know nothing of [our] war guilt." Little wonder, then, that Fritz Fischer's Griff nach der Wletmacht had such an explosive impact precisely thirty years later.

------




thought of Lenin as agent

supported Bolsheviks with funds, Lenin train

Seemed to go along with Parvus

wanted separate peace with Russia, and saw Bolsheviks as the way to do it

after Lenin installed, they got the treaty of Brest-Litovsk

Lenin first threatened to resign if Brest not signed, then later attacked it

Brest was controversial, contributed to outbreak of Russian civil war






------







There's a section on how the Okhrana operates here: https://books.google.com/books?id=h3By77UU4nIC&pg=PA2, which is a great book, although in general its hard to find good books on the Okhrana.



&nbsp;


http://digitalcommons.brockport.edu/cgi/viewcontent.cgi?article=1000&context=hashtaghistory






